Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF574.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1114HV (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 574 Section 1. Section 321.194, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. Consent ââ employment and established place of religious 3 worship . Prior to being authorized to operate a motor vehicle 4 unsupervised to a place of employment , or a location for 5 farm-related work while employed to work on a farm, or an 6 established place of religious worship, the applicantâs parent 7 or guardian must complete a written consent form prescribed by 8 the department. 9 a. The written consent form must include, at minimum, 10 the name and address of the applicantâs current place of 11 employment , or primary farm location, or established place of 12 religious worship, as applicable. 13 b. If the place of employment , or primary farm location , 14 or established place of religious worship changes, the parent 15 or guardian must complete a new written consent form prior 16 to the licensee being authorized to operate a motor vehicle 17 unsupervised to the new location. 18 c. While a licensee is operating a motor vehicle as 19 described in this subsection , the licensee shall carry a copy 20 of the written consent form in the vehicle and present the form 21 for inspection upon request by a certified peace officer. 22 Sec. 2. Section 321.194, subsection 4, paragraph b, 23 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 24 follows: 25 A licensee may operate a motor vehicle unsupervised over 26 the most direct and accessible route between the licenseeâs 27 residence, school of enrollment, location where the licensee 28 receives competent private instruction or independent private 29 instruction, place of employment, location for farm work or 30 farm-related work if the licensee resides on a farm or is 31 employed for compensation on a farm in this state, established 32 place of religious worship, and the closest service station, 33 for any of the following purposes, as applicable, provided 34 the driving distance between the point of origin and the 35 -1- LSB 1114HV (2) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 574 destination is no more than twenty-five miles, and the licensee 1 is in immediate possession of the license card: 2 Sec. 3. Section 321.194, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 3 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 4 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (06) To attend religious worship 5 services or participate in volunteer service programs at the 6 licenseeâs established place of religious worship, if approved 7 by the licenseeâs parent or guardian pursuant to subsection 2. 8 Sec. 4. Section 321.194, subsection 5, paragraphs a and e, 9 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 10 a. Operate the motor vehicle except during the hour 11 before and after the beginning and end of the licenseeâs duly 12 scheduled courses of instruction, extracurricular activities, 13 work shift, farm work, or farm-related work, religious worship 14 service, or volunteer service program, as applicable. 15 e. Operate a motor vehicle to the licenseeâs place of 16 employment , or location for farm work or farm-related work , or 17 established place of religious worship unless the licenseeâs 18 parent or guardian completed a written consent form and 19 the form is carried in the motor vehicle and available for 20 inspection in accordance with subsection 2 . 21